New York, session 2025-2026, A8007.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "right to refill act". 3 § 2. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 1352-f 4 to read as follows: 5 § 1352-f. Reusable beverage and food containers provided by customers. 6 1. Definitions. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall 7 have the following meanings: 8 a. "Food service establishment" shall mean a public place where 9 prepared food is sold for individual portion service, whether consump- 10 tion occurs on or off the premises. This term does not include retail 11 food stores. 12 b. "Reusable beverage container" shall mean a bottle, mug, cup or 13 other container that is designed and manufactured to hold beverages and 14 is capable of multiple reuses. 15 c. "Single-use container" shall mean a container that is designed and 16 intended to be used only once for drinking or eating, and is generally 17 recognized by the public as an item that is to be discarded after one 18 use. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09094-11-6 A. 8007--B 2 1 d. "Reusable food container" shall mean all containers, bowls, plates, 2 trays, cartons, cups, lids and other items that are designed and manu- 3 factured to hold food and are capable of multiple reuses. 4 2. Requirements. a. Any food service establishment in the state that 5 serves beverages to customers in single-use containers shall instead, at 6 the request of a customer who has ordered a beverage, serve such bever- 7 age in a reusable beverage container supplied by the customer, provided 8 that: 9 (i) Such reusable beverage container appears appropriate for serving 10 such beverage, based on a reasonable visual inspection by a food service 11 establishment employee as to the container's cleanliness, size and mate- 12 rial; 13 (ii) Such container is cleaned and sanitized in accordance with health 14 department regulations by a food service establishment employee prior to 15 refilling; and 16 (iii) Such beverage is dispensed in a manner that prevents contact 17 with, or contamination of, the food-contact surfaces of the beverage 18 dispensing equipment. 19 b. Any food service establishment in the state that serves food to 20 customers in single-use containers shall instead, at the request of a 21 customer who has leftovers from partially consumed meals, package such 22 leftovers in a reusable food container supplied by the customer, 23 provided that: 24 (i) Such reusable food container appears appropriate for packaging 25 such leftovers, based on a reasonable visual inspection by a food 26 service establishment employee as to the container's cleanliness, size 27 and material; 28 (ii) Such container is cleaned and sanitized in accordance with health 29 department regulations by a food service establishment employee prior to 30 refilling; and 31 (iii) Such leftovers are packaged in a manner that prevents contact 32 with, or contamination of, the food-contact surfaces of the food serving 33 equipment. 34 3. Notification. a. Every food service establishment in the state that 35 serves beverages to customers in single-use containers shall conspicu- 36 ously post signage informing customers that they are permitted to 37 request the service of beverages in their own reusable beverage contain- 38 ers. 39 b. Every food service establishment in the state that serves food to 40 customers in single-use containers shall conspicuously post signage 41 informing customers that they are permitted to request the packaging of 42 leftovers from partially consumed meals in their own reusable food 43 containers. 44 4. Takeout opt-in. a. Any food service establishment in the state that 45 serves food for takeout in single-use containers may, at their 46 discretion and at the request of a customer, serve food in a reusable 47 food container supplied by the customer, provided that: 48 (i) such reusable container appears appropriate for serving the food, 49 based on a reasonable visual inspection by a food service establishment 50 employee as to the container's cleanliness, size, and material; 51 (ii) such container is cleaned and sanitized in accordance with health 52 department regulations by a food service establishment employee prior to 53 refilling; and 54 (iii) the food is served in a manner that avoids contact with, or 55 contamination of, the food-contact surfaces of the food serving equip- 56 ment. A. 8007--B 3 1 b. A food service establishment in the state that chooses to serve 2 food for takeout in reusable food containers supplied by customers shall 3 conspicuously post signage informing customers that they are permitted 4 to request that food for takeout be served in the customer's own reus- 5 able food container. 6 5. Nothing in this section shall require a food service establishment 7 to fill a customer's reusable beverage container or reusable food 8 container if the establishment determines, based on reasonable concerns 9 related to food safety or operational feasibility, that such container 10 is not appropriate. 11 6. Liability. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose 12 liability on a food service establishment that, in good faith, accepts a 13 reusable beverage container or reuseable food container provided by a 14 customer, including claims related to foodborne illness, alleged contam- 15 ination, or the condition, safety, or integrity of the container, 16 provided that the establishment complies with the applicable provisions 17 of this section. 18 7. Rulemaking authority. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and 19 regulations establishing standards for safe handling by food service 20 establishments of reusable beverage containers and reusable food 21 containers provided by customers and for the incorporation of such stan- 22 dards into health inspections of food service establishments. In 23 promulgating such rules and regulations, the commissioner shall consider 24 input from local health departments, food service establishments, and 25 other relevant stakeholders. 26 § 3. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 27 law.